Utah statutes.
63B-19-401.   Lease-purchase authorizations.

The Legislature intends that the courts may use existing funds to enter into a lease-purchase agreement for the Spanish Fork Courthouse at no additional cost to the state.



Enacted by Chapter 100, 2010 General Session

